Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 7. General Provisions.

Sec. 11.56.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“improperly influence a witness” means to cause or induce a witness to

testify falsely, offer misleading testimony, or unlawfully withhold testimony in an official proceeding;

avoid or attempt to avoid legal process summoning the witness to testify in an official proceeding, regardless of whether legal process has issued;

be absent from an official proceeding to which the witness has been summoned; or

engage in conduct described in AS

11.56.610

;

“judicial officer” means a supreme court justice, including the chief justice, a judge of the court of appeals, a judge of the superior court, a district court judge, or a magistrate;

“juror” means a person who is a member of an impanelled jury or a person who has been drawn or summoned to attend as a prospective juror;

“physical evidence” means an article, object, document, record, or other thing of physical substance;

“testimony” means oral or written statements, documents, or other material that may be offered by a witness in an official proceeding;

“witness” means

a witness summoned or appearing in an official proceeding; or

a person who the defendant believes may be called as a witness in an official proceeding, present or future.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 20 ch 12 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

Definition of “official proceeding” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — None.

For definition of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

For additional definition of judicial officer, see AS

22.20.010

.